North Dakota, session 69, SB2275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Curriculum - Kindergarten through grade three - Foreign language - Pilot program.
Beginning with the 2025 - 26 school year and continuing through the 2026 - 27 school year, the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish and operate a pilot program to provide annual grants
to schools that provide instruction in a foreign language to students in kindergarten through grade three.
Grants awarded under the program may be used for program costs, materials, or stipends. Grants
awarded under this program may not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars per school per year.
The superintendent shall develop the requirements and procedures for a school to participate in the
program.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - FOREIGN
LANGUAGE TEACHER STIPENDS. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the
state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $49,500, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of public instruction, for the purpose of creating a pilot program to provide
grants to schools that provide instruction in a foreign language to students in kindergarten through
grade three, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2275 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2275.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 68 Nays 24 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State